Utah statutes.
62A-4a-710.   Interjurisdictional home study report.

(1)  The state of Utah may request a home study report from another state or an Indian Tribe for purposes of assessing the safety and suitability of placing a child in a home outside of the jurisdiction of the state of Utah.

(2)  The state of Utah may not impose any restriction on the ability of a state agency administering, or supervising the administration of, a state program operated under a state plan approved under Section 42 U.S.C. 671 to contract with a private agency to conduct a home study report described in Subsection (1).

(3)  When the state of Utah receives a home study report described in Subsection (1), the home study report shall be considered to meet all requirements imposed by the state of Utah for completion of a home study before a child is placed in a home, unless, within 14 days after the day on which the report is received, the state of Utah determines, based on grounds that are specific to the content of the report, that making a decision in reliance on the report would be contrary to the welfare of the child.

